Illinois, session 104th, HB1646.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 534-85c as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/34-85c)7    Sec. 34-85c. Alternative procedures for teacher 8evaluation, remediation, and removal for cause after 9remediation.10    (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board and 11the exclusive representative of the district's teachers are 12hereby authorized to enter into an agreement to establish 13alternative procedures for teacher evaluation, remediation, 14and removal for cause after remediation, including an 15alternative system for peer evaluation and recommendations; 16provided, however, that no later than September 1, 2012: (i) 17any alternative procedures must include provisions whereby 18student performance data is a significant factor in teacher 19evaluation and (ii) teachers are rated as "excellent", 20"proficient", "needs improvement" or "unsatisfactory". 21Pursuant exclusively to that agreement, teachers assigned to 22schools identified in that agreement shall be subject to an 23alternative performance evaluation plan and remediation   HB1646- 2 -LRB104 08280 LNS 18331 b1procedures in lieu of the plan and procedures set forth in 2Article 24A of this Code and alternative removal for cause 3standards and procedures in lieu of the removal standards and 4procedures set forth in Section 34-85 of this Code. To the 5extent that the agreement provides a teacher with an 6opportunity for a hearing on removal for cause before an 7independent hearing officer in accordance with Section 34-85 8or otherwise, the hearing officer shall be governed by the 9alternative performance evaluation plan, remediation 10procedures, and removal standards and procedures set forth in 11the agreement in making findings of fact and a recommendation.12    (a-5) If the Governor has declared a disaster due to a 13public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois 14Emergency Management Agency Act that suspends in-person 15instruction, the timelines connected to the commencement and 16completion of any remediation plan are paused. Except where 17the parties mutually agree otherwise and such agreement is in 18writing, any remediation plan that had been in place for 45 or 19more days prior to the suspension of in-person instruction 20shall resume when in-person instruction resumes; any 21remediation plan that had been in place for fewer than 45 days 22prior to the suspension of in-person instruction shall 23discontinue and a new remediation period will begin when 24in-person instruction resumes. 25    (a-10) No later than September 1, 2022, the school 26district must establish a teacher evaluation plan that ensures   HB1646- 3 -LRB104 08280 LNS 18331 b1that each teacher in contractual continued service whose 2performance is rated as either "excellent" or "proficient" is 3evaluated at least once in the course of the 3 school years 4after receipt of the rating and establish an informal teacher 5observation plan that ensures that each teacher in contractual 6continued service whose performance is rated as either 7"excellent" or "proficient" is informally observed at least 8once in the course of the 2 school years after receipt of the 9rating. 10    (a-15) For the 2022-2023 school year only, if the Governor 11has declared a disaster due to a public health emergency 12pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management 13Agency Act, the school district may waive the evaluation 14requirement of any teacher in contractual continued service 15whose performance was rated as either "excellent" or 16"proficient" during the last school year in which the teacher 17was evaluated under this Section.18    (a-20) If after the evaluation procedures established in 19subsection (a) of this Section are determined by the State 20Board of Education, in the State Board of Education's report 21under subsection (e) of Section 24A-20 of this Code, to have 22clear racial, ethnic, socio-economic, or geographic 23disparities for the educators evaluated under those evaluation 24procedures, then the board and the exclusive representative of 25the district's teachers shall enter into negotiations to 26create a new evaluation system, to be implemented no later   HB1646- 4 -LRB104 08280 LNS 18331 b1than August 15, 2026, that maintains the requirements 2established in subsection (a) of this Section and remedies the 3determined racial, ethnic, socio-economic, or geographic 4disparities. 5    (b) The board and the exclusive representative of the 6district's teachers shall submit a certified copy of an 7agreement as provided under subsection (a) of this Section to 8the State Board of Education.9(Source: P.A. 101-643, eff. 6-18-20; 102-252, eff. 1-1-22; 10102-729, eff. 5-6-22.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.